Utah statutes.
70C-6-103.   Creditor's provision of and charge for insurance -- Excess amount of charge.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a creditor may agree to provide insurance.  If insurance is not required, a charge for such insurance shall be separate from and in addition to other charges.  A creditor shall separately disclose any charge for insurance required and provided by it.  This title does not authorize the issuance of any insurance prohibited under any statute, rule, or regulation.

(2)  A charge for insurance which exceeds the maximum authorized by Section 70C-6-105 is an excess charge for the purposes of Chapter 7 on remedies and penalties, as to effect of violations on rights of parties under Section 70C-7-201, and of Chapter 8 on administration.



Enacted by Chapter 159, 1985 General Session

